Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-602
Forgery, first degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits forgery in the first degree if, with intent to deceive or harm, he falsely makes, completes, endorses, alters, or utters a written instrument which is or purports to be, or which is calculated to become or to represent if completed:

(a) Part of an issue of money, stamps, securities, or other valuable instruments issued by a government or governmental agency; or

(b) Part of an issue of stock, bonds, bank notes, or other instruments representing interests in or claims against a corporate or other organization or its property.

(2) Forgery in the first degree is a Class III felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 124.